Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-817
Official ballots; printing requirements.

The names of the candidates shall be set in boldface type using capital and lowercase letters. A square or oval shall be printed opposite the name of each candidate. At the general election, the name of the party represented by a candidate for partisan office shall be printed in capital and lowercase letters next to the name. Proposals submitted by initiative or referendum or for constitutional amendments shall be printed in capital and lowercase letters, but the title heading and number thereof shall be in boldface type, and the square or oval for voting thereon shall be printed opposite the text so that it is clear for which issue the voter is casting a vote. Ballots shall be printed with substantially the same appearance, including type and form, as the sample ballot furnished by the Secretary of State.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 238;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 15.